Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1786.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 18, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 8, to read: CHAPTER 8 ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE18-801. Artificial intelligence; content verification; definitions A. A covered provider shall include provenance data in any video, image or audio content that is created or materially altered by the covered provider's generative artificial intelligence system and that is available to be shared with users outside of the generative artificial intelligence system.  This subsection does not apply to text content that is generated as a result of an interactive experience, including voice assistant responses, virtual REALITY environments, augmented reality applications, real-time conversational artificial intelligence interactions and other real-time, dynamic interactions between a user and a generative artificial intelligence system. B. A covered provider shall use commercially and technically reasonable methods to make the provenance data difficult to remove or tamper with. The use of a commonly supported technical standard for watermarking and metadata complies with the requirements of this subsection. C. The Content is not considered materially altered for purposes of this section if the alteration consists of a minor modification that does not lead to significant changes to the perceived content or meaning of the content. D. To the extent that it is commercially and technically reasonable, a covered provider may not include any information that relates to an identified or reasonably identifiable individual in provenance data that is in any video, image or audio content created or materially altered by the covered provider's generative artificial intelligence system and that is subject to the requirements of this chapter unless the covered provider chooses to include the information where a user affirmatively elects to include the information. E. This chapter does not do either of the following: 1. Apply to any product, service, internet website or application that either: (a) exclusively provides video games or non-user-generated television, music, streaming, movie or interactive experiences. (b) Provides for the sale of goods or services directly to consumers through the internet and allows customers to browse, SELECT and purchase items virtually. 2. Require a covered provider to disclose any trade secret or confidential or proprietary information about the design or use of an artificial intelligence system. F. For the purposeS of this section: 1. "Covered provider": (a) Means a person or entity that creates, codes or otherwise produces a generative artificial intelligence system that has more than one million monthly users and that is publicly accessible within the geographic boundaries of this state to consumers for personal use. (b) Does not include any of the following: (i) a cloud service provider. (ii) A provider that distributes or makes available a generative artificial intelligence system that is primarily licensed or sold for business to business purposes. (iii) A product, service or application that is primarily marketed and intended to facilitate accessibility for a person with a disability if the developer takes reasonable measures to protect against unauthorized use. (iv) An internet service provider. (v) An internet service provider's affiliates or subsidiaries. (vi) An internet search engine. 2. "Generative artificial intelligence system" means an artificial intelligence system that can generate synthetic content. 3. "MINOR MODIFICATION" INCLUDES ALL OF THE FOLLOWING: (a) CHANGING THE BRIGHTNESS, CONTRAST OR COLOR. (b) SHARPENING. (c) SATURATING. (d) APPLYING FILTERS. (e) RESIZING. (f) SCALING. (g) CROPPING. (h) FORMAT CONVERSIONS. (i) RESAMPLING. (j) DENOISING. (k) REMOVING BACKGROUND NOISE IN AUDIO. 4. "Provenance data" means data that is embedded into digital content or that is included in the digital content's metadata to verify the digital content's authenticity, origin or history of modification and that includes generally accepted security best practices. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative findings The legislature intends that section 18-801, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, be broadly construed and applied to promote the underlying purpose of the act, which is all of the following: 1. To protect individuals and groups of individuals from known, and unknown but reasonably foreseeable, risks associated with artificial intelligence. 2. To provide transparency regarding those risks in the development, deployment or use of artificial intelligence systems. 3. To provide reasonable notice regarding the use of artificial intelligence systems. 4. To protect the public from fraud or deception. Sec. 3. Effective date This act is effective from and after February 1, 2027.